California statutes. Public Resources Code
“Glass food or drink container” means any nonbeverage container, whose principal component part or parts consist of virgin glass, postfilled glass, or any combination of both, in which any food or drink is sold or offered for sale in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1094, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.4.

“Handling fee” means an amount paid to an operator of a supermarket site, a rural region recycler, as defined in Section 14525.5.1, or a nonprofit convenience zone recycler, as defined in Section 14514.7, that is located in a convenience zone, for every beverage container redeemed by the operator at the supermarket or within the zone in which the supermarket site is located, by the rural region recycler, or by the nonprofit convenience zone recycler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 815, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.5.

“HDPE” means a plastic beverage container labeled with a “2” for high-density-polyethylene resin pursuant to Section 18015 and subject to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14514.

“Managing employee” includes, but is not limited to, any person who manages the operation of a facility or is authorized by the certified operator to sign shipping reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 731, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14514.4.1.

“Neighborhood dropoff program” means a recycling program that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The program is certified by the department as a dropoff or collection program.

(b) The program has been designated by a city, county, or city and county to provide a recycling opportunity in residential neighborhoods specified by the city, county, or city and county.

(c) The program is located in a rural region, as identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14571.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   (AB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14514.6.

“Not for recycling” means that an empty beverage container has been received by a processor who does not have an arrangement whereby that container will actually be recycled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14514.7.

“Nonprofit convenience zone recycler” means a recycling center that is either of the following:

(a) A recycling center that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The recycling center is operated by an organization established under Section 501(c) or 501(d) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(2) The recycling center is certified by the department pursuant to Section 14538.

(3) The recycling center is located within a convenience zone, but is not necessarily a supermarket site.

(b) A recycling center that meets all of the
 following criteria:

(1) The recycling center is operated by an organization established under Section 501(c) or 501(d) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(2) The recycling center is certified by the department pursuant to Section 14538.

(3) The recycling center is located within two miles of a supermarket that is in a convenience zone that is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 14571.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (SB 895)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.

“Other beverage container” means a beverage container which has a body consisting of metal, glass, plastic, other materials, or a combination of these, but which is not an aluminum, bimetal, glass, or plastic beverage container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1259, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.1.

“Out-of-state container” means a used beverage container or used beverage container component that is not subject to Section 14560, and that is brought into this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 731, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.2.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, operation, or entity, whether or not certified or registered pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.5.

“PET container” means a plastic beverage container labeled with a “1” pursuant to Section 18015 and subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 815, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.6.

“Physical recycling location” means the area in a convenience zone served by one or more reverse vending machines which accept all empty aluminum, glass, and plastic beverage containers and issue a cash refund or a redeemable credit slip and are located within 10 feet of each other. The physical recycling location shall redeem odd sized empty beverage containers or empty beverage containers made from other material types in a manner approved by the department. “Physical recycling location” does not include a combination of reverse vending machines which accept less than all empty aluminum, glass, and plastic beverage containers and one or more dropoff bins.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1342, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.8.

(a) “Pilot project recycler” means a recycling location established under Section 14571.9.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   (SB 1113)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14516.

“Place of business of the dealer” means the location at which a dealer sells, or offers for sale, beverages in beverage containers to consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14517.

“Plastic beverage container” means a beverage container which has a body consisting primarily of plastic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14517.5.

“Postfilled container” means any container which had been previously filled with a beverage or food.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14518.

“Processor” means any person, including a scrap dealer, certified by the department who purchases empty aluminum beverage containers, bimetal beverage containers, glass beverage containers, plastic beverage containers, or any other beverage containers, including any one or more of those beverage containers, which have a refund value established pursuant to this division, from recycling centers in this state for recycling, or, if the container is not recyclable, not for recycling, and who cancels, or who certifies to the department in a form prescribed by the department the cancellation of, the refund value of these empty beverage containers by processing empty beverage containers, in any manner which the department may prescribe. However, the department shall not take any action regulating scrap dealers or recycling centers who are processors or recycling centers unless authorized by and pursuant to the goals of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14518.4.

“Processing fee” means the amount paid by beverage manufacturers to the department pursuant to Section 14575.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 624, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14518.5.

“Processing payment” means an amount paid to processors, dropoff or collection programs, curbside programs, and recycling centers by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14573 and subdivision (a) of Section 14573.5 when the department determines that the scrap value being offered by container manufacturers, beverage manufacturers, or willing purchasers for a particular container material is insufficient to insure the economic recovery of the container type at the minimum number of recycling centers or locations required pursuant to Section 14571. The processing payment shall be determined by the department pursuant to Section 14575.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 624, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14519.

“Recycle,” “recycled,” “recycling,” or “recyclable” means the reuse or refilling of empty beverage containers, or the process of sorting, cleansing, treating, and reconstituting empty postfilled beverage containers for the purpose of using the altered form. “Recycle,” “recycled,” “recycling,” or “recyclable” does not include merely sorting, shredding, stripping, compressing, storing, landfilling with, or disposing of an empty beverage container.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14519.5.

“Recycler” means a recycling center, dropoff or collection program, or curbside program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 815, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14520.

“Recycling center” means an operation which is certified by the department and which accepts from consumers, and pays or provides the refund value pursuant to Section 14572 for, empty beverage containers intended to be recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14520.5.

“Recycling location” means a place, mobile unit, reverse vending machine, or other device where a certified recycling center accepts one or more types of empty beverage containers from consumers, and pays or provides the refund value for one or more types of empty beverage containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14520.6.

“Noncertified recycler” means a person, entity, or operation which is not certified by the department and which purchases empty beverage containers from consumers, or from dropoff or collection programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14521.

“Recycling rate” means the proportion of empty beverage containers by type returned to processors for recycling, measured in the manner prescribed in Section 14551.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14522.5.

“Redemption” and “redeem” means the return to a recycling center or location of an empty beverage container for a refund of at least the refund value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 10.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14523.

“Redemption payment” means the minimum amount paid by a distributor to the department for every beverage container sold or transferred to a dealer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 12.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14523.5.

“Redemption rate” means the proportion of empty beverage containers returned to processors measured in the manner prescribed in Section 14551.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14524.

“Refund value” means the amount established for each type of beverage container pursuant to Section 14560 that is paid by the following:

(a) A certified recycling center to the consumer or dropoff or collection center for each beverage container redeemed by the consumer or dropoff or collection center. With respect to consumers returning containers to recycling centers, the refund value shall not be subject to tax under the Personal Income Tax Law (Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) or the Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(b) A processor to a certified recycling center, dropoff or collection program, or curbside program, for each beverage container received from the certified recycling center, dropoff or collection program, or curbside program.

(c) The department to a processor, for each beverage container received by the processor from a certified recycling center, curbside program, or dropoff or collection program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14525.

“Refillable beverage container” means any aluminum beverage container, bimetal beverage container, glass beverage container, plastic beverage container, or other beverage container, holding 150 fluid ounces or less of beverage, which has a minimum deposit of three cents ($0.03), and which ordinarily would be returned to the manufacturer to be refilled and resold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1259, Sec. 4.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14525.1.

“Reusable beverage container” means a glass beverage container
 with a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560 and that is processed by a processor for subsequent washing for refill and sale by a beverage manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (AB 962)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14525.5.

“Reverse vending machine” means a mechanical device which accepts one or more types of empty beverage containers and issues a cash refund or a redeemable credit slip with a value not less than the container’s refund value. The refund value payments shall be aggregated and then paid, if more than one container is redeemed in a single transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 15.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14525.5.1.

“Rural region recycler” means an operator that is certified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14571, and who accepts or collects empty beverage containers from consumers pursuant to Section 14572 with the intention to recycle them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.   (AB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14526.

“Scrap value” means the price paid for container material types subject to this division, after shipping and handling costs are deducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1274, Sec. 4.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14526.5.

(a) “Supermarket” means a full-line, self-service retail store with gross annual sales of six million dollars ($6,000,000), or more, and which sells a line of dry groceries, canned goods, alcoholic or nonalcoholic beverages, nonfood items, or some perishable items, regardless of whether the retail store operates a bakery or a deli. For purposes of determining which dealers are “supermarkets,” the department shall consult the most recent annual
 update to the Progressive Grocer Marketing Guidebook and any other relevant update developed in conjunction with that guidebook.

(b) Notwithstanding the changes to this section made by the act adding this subdivision, a recycling center that was eligible to receive handling fees immediately before the effective date of that act shall continue to be eligible to receive handling fees on and after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 319, Sec. 1.   (SB 955)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14526.6.

“Supermarket site” means any certified recycling center which redeems all types of empty beverage containers in accordance with Section 14572, and which is located within, or outside and immediately adjacent to the entrance of, or at, or within a parking lot or loading area surrounding, a supermarket which is the focal point of a convenience zone, or a dealer that is located within that zone, and which is accessible to motor traffic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 624, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14527.

“Use or consumption” includes the exercise of any right or power over a beverage incidental to the beverage’s ownership, including, but not limited to, drinking the beverage. “Use or consumption” does not include the sale, or the keeping or retention, of a beverage for the purposes of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14528.

“Universal product code” is an 11-digit, all-numeric code that represents a beverage container or other consumer package of a particular brand, size, type, and manufacturer by using a series of alternating bars and spaces for electronic scanning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14528.1.

“Voluntary artificial scrap value” means a price paid by a willing purchaser of empty PET containers, that reflects the payment of the scrap value for all PET containers sold, and that, when combined with payments made from the PET processing fee account pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14581, is equal to, or more than, the recycling cost for empty PET containers, as determined in subdivision (d) of Section 14575.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14528.5.

(a) “Wine and distilled spirit cooler” means a beverage containing wine or distilled spirits to which is added concentrated or unconcentrated juice or flavoring material.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 8.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14529.

This division is a matter of statewide interest and concern and is applicable uniformly throughout the state. Accordingly, this division occupies the whole field of regulation of recycling-related refund values, redemption payments, deposits, and similar fees relating to beverage containers, as provided in this division, and to containers of wine and distilled spirits products. No city, county, or other public agency may enforce or implement any existing or new ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule establishing recycling-related refund values, redemption payments, deposits, or similar fees relating to these containers in the state unless expressly authorized by this division. If a federal law is enacted which establishes recycling-related refund values, redemption payments, deposits, and similar fees, relating to beverage containers, other than a federal law only affecting federal lands, or if a state law is enacted by initiative, which establishes recycling-related refund values, redemption payments, deposits, and similar fees relating to beverage containers, this division shall become inoperative. This section does not prohibit the implementation or enforcement of any ordinance or regulation governing curbside or dropoff recycling programs operated by, or pursuant to a contract with, a city, county, or other public agency, including actions relating to fees, or establishing fees, for these programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 16.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14529.5.

Any action to increase recycling taken by the department, or by any person or entity, affecting scrap values, the quantities of materials being recycled, or the method of invoicing the sale of beverages pursuant to this division is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code) and the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code). This section does not apply to any action taken by a recycling center to increase the recycling of beverage containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 624, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14529.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this division does not apply to any program involving the collection and payment of deposits for beverage containers sold, used, or consumed at national parks and monuments, military installations, or any other property owned by and under the jurisdiction of the United States.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, this division, including, but not limited to, Section 14560.5, shall apply to a national park or monument, military installation, or any other property owned by, and under the jurisdiction of, the United States, with regard to a beverage container not otherwise subject to a program involving the collection and payment of deposits for beverage containers.

(c) For purposes of this section, “a program involving the collection and payment of deposits” means a program, other than one imposed pursuant to this division, at a national park or monument, military installation, or any other property owned by, and under the jurisdiction of, the United States, that imposes a deposit on a beverage container at the time of sale and provides an opportunity for the beverage container purchaser to redeem the deposit at the national park or monument, military installation, or other property owned by, and under the jurisdiction of, the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 731, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [14530. - 14549.9.]

14530.

This division shall be administered by the department. Notwithstanding Section 607, the department may, for organizational purposes, create a new division, bureau, or office to administer this division. If a new division, bureau, or office is created, any reference to “department” or “director” in this division shall be deemed to be a reference to that entity and the officer in charge of that entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14530.1.

There is hereby created within the department a recycling financial analysis and policy development unit, to develop, analyze, consolidate, and evaluate economic and policy proposals to carry out the objectives of this division, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Evaluate the solvency of the fund on an ongoing basis in order to make recommendations and report to the Legislature.

(b) Identify the fiscal impacts of proposed recycling programs, or changes to existing recycling programs.

(c) Assess the economic impacts of recycling proposals and programs on the state’s citizens and businesses, including the impact of adding new container types into existing law.

(d) Develop recommendations to better integrate the various recycling alternatives available from state government, local government, and private industry with the objective of reducing recycling costs to citizens and businesses and meeting the 80-percent recycling goal established by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 158.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14530.2.

The Division of Recycling shall be administered by an assistant director who is appointed by the Governor. The appointment shall be exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14530.5.

(a) For purposes of entering into contracts for consulting, promotional, or advisory services necessary to implement this division, the requirements of Sections 11042 and 14615 of the Government Code and Sections 10295 and 10318 of the Public Contract Code do not apply to the activities of the department pursuant to this division, except that any sole source contract awarded by the department shall be reviewed and approved by the Department of General Services.

(b) In addition to any regulations which the department is required by statute to adopt, the department may adopt any other rules and regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code which the department determines may be necessary or useful to carry out this division or any of the department’s duties or responsibilities imposed pursuant to this division.

(c) The department may prepare, publish, and issue printed pamphlets, promotional materials, and bulletins which the director determines to be necessary for the dissemination of information to the public concerning the activities of the department pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1258, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14530.6.

Upon the request of the department, the Attorney General shall represent the department and the state in litigation concerning affairs of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14531.

A payment made pursuant to this division, including, but not limited to, a handling fee payment, refund value payment, processing fee payment, or processing payment, may be made electronically.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   (AB 2493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14536.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the director shall adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The director shall adopt regulations, and may adopt emergency regulations for the purposes of implementing Sections 14538, 14539, 14541, 14549.1, 14549.2, 14549.7, 14550, 14561, 14574, 14575, 14585, 14588.1, 14588.2, and 14591.

(2) Any emergency regulations, if adopted, shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be filed with, but not be repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until revised by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 907, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14536.1.

Notwithstanding Section 14536, if the department determines that it is necessary to adopt or amend regulations to implement Section 14575, the department may adopt or amend those regulations as emergency regulations. The Office of Administrative Law shall consider those regulations to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare for purposes of Section 11349.6 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the emergency regulations adopted or amended pursuant to this section shall be repealed 180 days after the effective date of the regulations, unless the department complies with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 624, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14536.3.

A traffic officer, as defined in Section 625 of the Vehicle Code, or a peace officer, as specified in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, may enforce this division as an authorized representative of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 33.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14536.5.

(a) In carrying out the division, the department may solicit and use all expertise available in other state agencies and where an existing state agency performs functions of a similar nature to the department’s functions, the department may contract with, or cooperate with, the agency in carrying out this division.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Department of Food and Agriculture may, as requested by the department, collect, compile, and report information regarding the importation of filled or postfilled beverage containers. Border agricultural inspection stations and any other appropriate information gathering focal points may be used and the plant quarantine officers and supervisors of the Department of Food and Agriculture shall collect, compile, and report information requested by the department pursuant to this subdivision. Recovery of costs incurred by the Department of Food and Agriculture shall be accomplished through an interagency agreement with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1148, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14536.7.

For purposes of Section 12024.13 of the Business and Professions Code, the department shall notify the Department of Food and Agriculture of any changes to this division, or regulations issued pursuant to this division, that affect refund values, redemption payments, or the responsibilities of a dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14537.

The department shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, and these books, records, and accounts are subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the department. The auditing firm or the department shall also conduct a selective audit of entities making payments to, or receiving payments from, the department to determine whether redemption payments and applicable processing fees are being paid to the department on all beverage containers sold in California, and that refund values and processing payments are being paid out properly by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 874, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14537.1.

The department shall, to the extent feasible, make efforts to streamline and consolidate forms used by wineries who are also distributors to both register as part of the beverage container recycling program and provide required payments under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 9.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14537.5.

The department shall provide on its internet website information that enables consumers to identify the geographic location of all points of redemption for beverage containers, to be updated at least once per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 19.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14538.

(a) (1) The department shall certify an operator of a recycling center pursuant to this section.

(2) The department shall review whether an application for certification or renewal is complete within 30 working days of receipt, including compliance with subdivision (c). If the department deems an application complete, the department shall approve or deny the application no later than 60 calendar days after the date when the application was deemed complete.

(b) The director shall adopt, by regulation, a procedure for the certification of recycling centers, including standards and requirements for certification. These regulations shall require that all information be submitted
 to the department under penalty of perjury. A recycling center shall meet all of the standards and requirements contained in the regulations for certification. The regulations shall require, but shall not be limited to requiring, that all of the following conditions be met for certification:

(1) The operator of the recycling center demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the department, that the operator will operate in accordance with this division.

(2) If one or more certified entities have operated at the same location within the past five years, the operations at the location of the recycling center exhibit, to the satisfaction of the department, a pattern of operation in compliance with the requirements of this division and regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(3) The operator of the recycling center
 notifies the department promptly of any material change in the nature of the operator’s operations that conflicts with information submitted in the operator’s application for certification.

(c) (1) An applicant for certification as a recycling center, and a recycling center applying for renewal of a certification, shall complete the precertification training program required by this subdivision and meet all other qualification requirements prescribed by the department, which may include, but are not limited to, requiring the applicant to obtain a passing score on an examination administered by the department.

(2) The department may use staff or industry experts, or may seek expertise available in other state agencies, to provide the training program required by this subdivision, which shall include providing technical assistance to better prepare recycling
 centers for successful participation in this division, thereby reducing the potential for errors, fraud, or other activities that compromise the integrity of the implementation of this division.

(d) A certified recycling center shall comply with all of the following requirements for operation:

(1) The operator of the recycling center shall not pay a refund value for, or receive a refund value from any processor for, any food or drink packaging material or any beverage container or other product that does not have a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560.

(2) The operator of a recycling center shall take actions that satisfy the department to prevent the payment of a refund value for any food or drink packaging material or any beverage container or other product that does not have a refund value
 established pursuant to Section 14560.

(3) (A) Unless exempted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14572, a certified recycling center shall accept, and pay at least the refund value for, all empty beverage containers, regardless of type.

(B) A bag drop recycling center shall pay the refund value for beverage containers within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed three business days. The refund value may be paid electronically in accordance with Section 14531.

(4) A certified recycling center shall not pay any refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees to a noncertified recycler.

(5) A certified recycling center shall not pay any refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees on empty beverage
 containers or other containers that the certified recycling center knew, or should have known, were coming into the state from out of the state, or are otherwise ineligible for redemption.

(6) (A) A certified recycling center shall not claim refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees on empty beverage containers that the certified recycling center knew, or should have known, were received from noncertified recyclers.

(B) A certified recycling center shall not claim refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees on empty beverage containers that the certified recycling center knew, or should have known, come from out of the state, or are otherwise ineligible for redemption.

(7) A certified recycling center shall prepare and maintain the following documents involving empty beverage containers, as specified by the department by regulation:

(A) Shipping reports that are required to be prepared by the recycling center, or that are required to be obtained from other recycling centers.

(B) Consumer transaction receipts.

(C) Consumer transaction logs.

(D) Rejected container receipts on materials subject to this division.

(E) Receipts for transactions with beverage manufacturers on materials subject to this division.

(F) Receipts for transactions with beverage distributors on materials subject to this division.

(G) Documents authorizing the recycling center to cancel empty beverage containers.

(H) Weight tickets.

(8) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (7), a certified recycling center shall cooperate with the department and make available its records of scrap transactions when the review of these records is necessary for an audit or investigation by the department.

(e) The department may recover, in restitution pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 14591.2, payments made from the fund to the certified recycling center pursuant to Section 14573.5 that are based on the documents specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (d), that are not prepared or maintained in compliance with the department’s regulations, and that do not allow the department to verify claims for program payments.

(f) The department may certify a recycling center that will operate less than 30 hours a week, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14571.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 20.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14539.

(a) (1) The department shall certify processors pursuant to this section.

(2) The department shall review whether an application for certification or renewal is complete within 30 working days of receipt, including compliance with subdivision (c). If the department deems an application complete, the department shall approve or deny the application no later than 60 calendar days after the date when the application was deemed complete.

(b) The director shall adopt, by regulation, requirements and standards for certification. The regulations shall require, but shall not be limited to requiring, that all of
 the following conditions be met for certification:

(1) The processor demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the processor will operate in accordance with this division.

(2) If one or more certified entities have operated at the same location within the past five years, the operations at the location of the processor exhibit, to the satisfaction of the department, a pattern of operation in compliance with the requirements of this division and regulations adopted pursuant to this division.
